LatvianLexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +N      ! Noun tag
    +Sg     ! Singular
    +Pl     ! Plural
    +Nom    ! Nominative
    +Gen    ! Genitive
    +Dat    ! Dative
    +Acc    ! Accusative
    +Loc    ! Locative

LEXICON Start
  Subst ;

LEXICON Subst
  vēj     D1š ;
  kok     D1s ;
  snieg   D1s ;
  tilt    D1s ;
  bild    D5  ;
  tulp    D5  ;
  brīz    D5  ;
  gāz     D5  ;
  planšet D5  ;
  front   D5  ;
  haiziv  D6  ;
  krāsn   D6  ;
  dzelz   D6  ;
  ugun    D6  ;

! 1. deklinācija (D1š):
LEXICON D1š
+N+Sg+Nom:^š # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;

! 1. deklinācija (D1s):
LEXICON D1s
+N+Sg+Nom:^s # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;

! 5. deklinācija (D5):
LEXICON D5
+N+Sg+Nom:^e # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^es # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^VMu # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs # ;

! 6. deklinācija (D6):
LEXICON D6
+N+Sg+Nom:^s # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^s # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ij # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^is # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^VMu # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^īm # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^is # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^īs # ;
